North Carolina, session 2025, HB232.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The State Controller shall transfer the sum of sixteen million three
hundred ninety-two thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($16,392,176) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year from funds available in the State Emergency Response and
Disaster Relief Reserve to the Department of Transportation's Rail Division (Division) for the
Freight Rail & Rail Safety Improvement Fund (Rail Fund) established by G.S. 124-5.1, and those
funds are appropriated from the Rail Fund for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this
section.
SECTION 1.(b) The Division shall use the funds transferred and appropriated
pursuant to this section to provide grants for recovery and repair of the following short-line
railroads damaged by Hurricane Helene:
(1) Fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) to the Blue Ridge Southern Railroad,
LLC, for line restoration.
(2) Two million three hundred ninety-two thousand one hundred seventy-six
dollars ($2,392,176) for track rehabilitation, facility repairs, and revenue loss
to the Great Smoky Mountains Railroad, LLC.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H232-v-1*